Utah statutes.
53A-8a-505.   Necessary staff reduction not precluded -- Last-hired, first-fired layoffs prohibited.

(1)  Nothing in this chapter prevents staff reduction if necessary to reduce the number of employees because of the following:

(a)  declining student enrollments in the district;

(b)  the discontinuance or substantial reduction of a particular service or program;

(c)  the shortage of anticipated revenue after the budget has been adopted; or

(d)  school consolidation.

(2)  A school district may not utilize a last-hired, first-fired layoff policy when terminating school district employees.

(3)  A school district may consider the following factors when terminating a school district employee:

(a)  the results of an employee's performance evaluation; and

(b)  a school's personnel needs.

